District of Columbia statutes.
1-748

Claims procedure.

In accordance with regulations issued by the Board, the Board shall provide to any participant or beneficiary who has a claim for benefits under a retirement program denied:

(1)

Adequate written notice of such denial, setting forth the specific reasons for such denial in a manner calculated to be understood by such participant or beneficiary; and

(2)

A reasonable opportunity for a full and fair review of the decision denying such claim.

History

Nov. 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 866, Pub. L. 96-122, § 188
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 3(d), 52 DCR 2638

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-748.
1973 Ed., § 1-1848.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “In accordance with regulations issued by the Board, the Board shall” for “In accordance with regulations of the Council, the Mayor shall”.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority under Law 4-123, see Mayor’s Order 83-245, October 14, 1983.